Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-810
Act; how construed.

The Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act shall not be construed to apply retroactively to or prohibit importation into this state of wildlife or wild plants which may be lawfully imported into the United States or lawfully taken and removed from another state, or prohibit entry into this state or the possession, transportation, exportation, processing, sale or offer for sale, or shipment of any wildlife or wild plants which have been determined to be an endangered or threatened species in this state but not in the state where originally taken if the person engaging in such activity demonstrates by substantial evidence that such wildlife or wild plants were lawfully taken and lawfully removed from such state. This section shall not be construed to permit the possession, transportation by a person other than a common or contract motor carrier under the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission or the Interstate Commerce Commission, exportation, processing, sale or offer for sale, or shipment within this state of species of wildlife or wild plants determined, pursuant to the Endangered Species Act, to be an endangered or threatened species, except as permitted by subsection (11) of section 37-806.

Laws 1975, LB 145, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-438;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 360.